Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7445.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds and declares:
(1) That the State of Rhode Island is experiencing a shortage of housing that threatens
affordability, economic stability, and community well-being. The general assembly further finds
that faith-based organizations often own or control underutilized land that may be suitable for
residential development.
(2) Therefore, it is the policy of the State of Rhode Island to authorize faith-based
organizations to develop affordable housing as a use-by-right on property that faith-based
organizations own or control.
(3) Chapter 51 of title 34 is intended to increase housing access, reduce unnecessary
regulatory barriers, and encourage mixed-use, community-focused development. Project approvals
shall be based on objective and transparent standards to ensure operational flexibility for faith-
based organizations while remaining responsive to local housing needs.
SECTION 2. Title 34 of the General Laws entitled "PROPERTY" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 51
FAITH-BASED AFFORDABLE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ACT
34-51-1. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Faith-based Affordable Housing
Development Act."
34-51-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) “Active ground floor” means a portion of the ground floor dedicated to public-facing
or commercial uses, including retail, restaurants, community centers, or similar uses.
(2) “Affordable housing” means housing units restricted to households earning no more
than eighty percent (80%) of the area median income, as determined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), with affordability restrictions maintained
for a period consistent with state low-income housing tax credit eligibility requirements.
(3) “Ancillary uses” means uses that support and complement the mission of a faith-based
organization, including child care, social services, educational uses, and small-scale commercial
uses not exceeding three thousand square feet (3,000 ft2) per establishment.
(4) “Development site” means land owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by a faith-based
organization and eligible for residential, commercial, or mixed-use development, excluding light
and heavy industrial zones unless residential uses are expressly permitted.
(5) “Faith-based organization” means a religious institution, including churches, temples,
mosques, synagogues, and religious higher education institutions, that owns or leases the
development site.
(6) “Housing unit” means a self-contained residential dwelling unit designed for occupancy
by one household.
(7) “Ministerial review” means a non-discretionary approval process based solely on
objective standards without public hearings or subjective judgment.
(8) “Mixed-use development” means a development containing both residential uses and
ancillary uses.
(9) “Net habitable square feet” means finished, heated, and enclosed floor area, excluding
parking, garages, and unfinished spaces.
(10) “Project” means development, construction, or renovation undertaken by a faith-based
organization on a development site.
(11) “Public benefit incentive” means additional development allowances granted in
exchange for providing affordable housing, community services, or environmental preservation.
(12) “Serviced lot” means a parcel connected to municipal water and sewer systems.
(13) “Steep slope” means land with a rise of ten feet (10') over twenty-five feet (25') or a
LC004245 - Page 2 of 5

slope of forty percent (40%) or greater.
34-51-3. Project eligibility.
(a) Projects shall be owned or controlled by a faith-based organization through fee
ownership or a lease of not less than fifty-five (55) years.
(b) Development sites shall be located in zones permitting residential, commercial,
institutional, civic, single-family, duplex, or multifamily uses.
(c) Industrial zones are excluded unless residential uses are expressly permitted.
(d) Mixed-use developments shall dedicate at least sixty percent (60%) of net habitable
square feet to residential use.
(e) Projects shall comply with applicable building, fire, health, life safety codes, and the
federal Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3601 et seq.
34-51-4. State preemption.
(a) This chapter shall preempt any local ordinance or regulation that conflicts with its
provisions.
(b) Municipalities shall not impose discretionary review, special permits, additional fees,
or conditions beyond those applicable to comparable by-right developments.
(c) Targeted regulations singling out faith-based organization projects are prohibited and
void.
34-51-5. Affordable housing standards.
(a) Municipalities may adopt generally applicable affordability ordinances consistent with
this chapter.
(b) Affordability requirements shall not exceed state low-income housing tax credit
affordability periods and shall rely on HUD income limits and rent schedules.
34-51-6. Base development incentives.
(a) Projects shall be permitted a base density of thirty (30) dwelling units per acre.
(b) Where greater density or height is allowed on the site or adjoining sites, the project
shall be entitled to the greater allowance.
(c) Projects may exceed existing height limits by one story or fifteen feet (15'), with a base
floor area ratio (“FAR”) of 2:1.
(d) No minimum parking requirements shall apply to residential or ancillary uses.
34-51-7. Bonus incentives.
(a) Active ground floor ancillary uses qualify for an additional FAR bonus of 0.5.
(b) Projects with forty percent (40%) or more two (2) bedroom units qualify for increased
density up to fifty (50) units per acre and additional height bonuses.
LC004245 - Page 3 of 5

(c) Preservation of mature trees qualifies for height bonuses.
(d) Maximum FAR under incentives shall be 3:1 and maximum height forty-five feet (45'),
unless underlying zoning allows more.
34-51-8. Development standards.
(a) Existing setback requirements shall apply unless waived.
(b) Municipalities shall not impose minimum unit sizes, lot coverage limits, or mandatory
open space requirements.
34-51-9. Review and approval.
(a) Eligible projects shall be approved through ministerial review.
(b) Decisions shall be issued within fifteen (15) days of a complete application.
(c) Permitting and inspections shall be conducted concurrently, with final approvals issued
within sixty (60) business days.
34-51-10. Environmental and safety requirements.
(a) Floodplain projects shall comply with Federal Emergency Management Agency
(FEMA) and state flood standards.
(b) Projects on steep slopes shall submit geotechnical analyses and mitigation measures.
34-51-11. Exemptions.
(a) Sites within one thousand six hundred feet (1,600') of industrial uses within the meaning
of Title V of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 7661-7661f, implemented pursuant to 40 CFR
Part 70 shall be excluded.
(b) Environmentally protected lands and wetlands are exempt.
(c) Additional setbacks may be required near critical infrastructure.
34-51-12. Enforcement and oversight.
The Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation shall monitor compliance and
may refer violations to the attorney general for enforcement.
34-51-13. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter is held invalid, the remaining provisions shall remain in
effect.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004245
========
LC004245 - Page 4 of 5